Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.80.051

Precinct committee officer—Election—Term.

The statutory requirements for filing as a candidate at the primaries apply to candidates for precinct committee officer. The office must be voted upon at the primaries, and the names of all candidates in contested races must appear under the proper party and office designations on the ballot for the primary for each even-numbered year. The candidate receiving the highest number of votes will be declared elected. The term of office of precinct committee officer is two years, commencing the first day of December following the primary.

[ 2012 c 89 s 5; 2004 c 271 s 149.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—Effective date—2012 c 89: See notes following RCW 29A.24.311.